Hawaii statutes.
§490:4-206 Transfer between banks. Any
agreed method that identifies the transferor bank is sufficient for the item's
further transfer to another bank. [L 1965, c 208, §4-206; HRS §490:4-206; am L
1991, c 118, pt of §4]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next